Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5562.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 28B.92.030 and 2022 c 166 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Council" means the student achievement council.(2) "Financial aid" means either loans, grants, or both, to students who demonstrate financial need enrolled or accepted for enrollment as a student at institutions of higher education.(3) "Financial need" means a demonstrated financial inability to bear the total cost of education as directed in rule by the office.(4) "Institution" or "institutions of higher education" means:(a) Any public university, college, community college, or technical college operated by the state of Washington or any political subdivision thereof; or(b) Any other university, college, school, or institute in the state of Washington offering instruction beyond the high school level that is a member institution of an accrediting association recognized by rule of the council for the purposes of this section and that agrees to and complies with program rules adopted pursuant to RCW 28B.92.150. However, any institution, branch, extension or facility operating within the state of Washington that is affiliated with an institution operating in another state must be:(i) A separately accredited member institution of any such accrediting association;(ii) A branch of a member institution of an accrediting association recognized by rule of the council for purposes of this section, that is eligible for federal student financial aid assistance and has operated as a nonprofit college or university delivering on-site classroom instruction for a minimum of twenty consecutive years within the state of Washington, and has an annual enrollment of at least seven hundred full-time equivalent students;(iii) A nonprofit institution recognized by the state of Washington as provided in RCW 28B.77.240; or(iv) An approved apprenticeship program under chapter 49.04 RCW.(5) "Maximum Washington college grant":(a) For students attending two or four-year institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, is tuition and estimated fees for fifteen quarter credit hours or the equivalent, as determined by the office, including operating fees, building fees, and services and activities fees.(b) For students attending private four-year not-for-profit institutions of higher education in Washington, in the 2019-20 academic year, is nine thousand seven hundred thirty-nine dollars and may increase each year afterwards by no more than the tuition growth factor.(c) For students attending two-year private not-for-profit institutions of higher education in Washington, in the 2019-20 academic year, is three thousand six hundred ninety-four dollars and may increase each year afterwards by no more than the tuition growth factor.(d) For students attending four-year private for-profit institutions of higher education in Washington, in the 2019-20 academic year, is eight thousand five hundred seventeen dollars and may increase each year afterwards by no more than the tuition growth factor.(e) For students attending two-year private for-profit institutions of higher education in Washington, in the 2019-20 academic year, is two thousand eight hundred twenty-three dollars and may increase each year afterwards by no more than the tuition growth factor.(f) For students attending Western Governors University-Washington, as established in RCW 28B.77.240, in the 2019-20 academic year, is five thousand six hundred nineteen dollars and may increase each year afterwards by no more than the tuition growth factor.(g) For students attending approved apprenticeship programs, beginning in the 2022-23 academic year, is the same amount as the maximum Washington college grant for students attending two-year institutions of higher education as defined in (a) of this subsection to be used for tuition and fees((, program supplies and equipment, and other costs that facilitate educational endeavors)). The amount in determining the cost cannot include tuition and fees for students attending approved apprenticeship programs that otherwise pay for the cost of the tuition and fees, or its equivalent, through the approved apprenticeship program or any other method that pays tuition and fees, or their equivalent, for the student. The office shall assess compliance with this requirement based on apprenticeship programs as they existed as of July 1, 2022, in accordance with chapter 166, Laws of 2022.(6) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance.(7) "Tuition growth factor" means an increase of no more than the average annual percentage growth rate of the median hourly wage for Washington for the previous fourteen years as the wage is determined by the federal bureau of labor statistics.Sec. 2. RCW 28B.124.030 and 2022 c 166 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) All institutions of higher education((, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016,)) must establish a policy for granting as many credits as possible and appropriate((,)) for related supplemental instruction in active state apprenticeship programs((, registered during or before July 1, 2022, by the 2028-29 school year. For all state registered apprenticeship programs approved after July 1, 2022, all institutions of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, must establish a policy for granting as many credits, as possible and appropriate, for related supplemental instruction within six years of the program's registration. While establishing credits, institutions of higher education must consult with their faculty representatives. Credits are at the sole discretion of each institution of higher education and must be determined in consultation with their faculty representatives)).(2) Credits for related supplemental instruction must be approved within a reasonable amount of time, not to exceed one year from the date of the program's registration or the effective date of this section. Exceptions may be made for good cause on a case-by-case basis.(3) Credits established by institutions of higher education are not intended to impact the possible revision of previously approved related supplemental instruction in a state registered apprenticeship program.(4) All credits granted for related supplemental instruction must count towards a degree from an institution of higher education as of July 1, 2026. The institution of higher education which granted the credit need not be the same as the institution where the apprentice receives the degree. The student achievement council shall ensure that the statewide transfer of credit policy and agreement under RCW 28B.77.210 is designed to facilitate the transfer of credit and the evaluation of transcripts for students attending approved apprenticeship programs.(5) For the purpose of this section, "institutions of higher education" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28B.77 RCW to read as follows:The council shall adopt statewide transfer and articulation policies, in alignment with RCW 28B.124.030, that ensure efficient transfer of credits for related supplemental instruction for students attending approved apprenticeship programs across public two and four-year institutions of higher education by July 1, 2026. Policies may address, but are not limited to: Creation of a statewide system of course equivalency; creation of transfer associate degrees; statewide articulation agreements; applicability of technical courses toward baccalaureate degrees; and other issues. The institutions of higher education and the state board for community and technical colleges shall cooperate with the council in developing the statewide policies and shall provide support and staff resources as necessary to assist in maintaining the policies.--- END ---